Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.232

Licensee's bond to operate special open consignment horse sale—Amount determined by estimate of business—Minimum amount.

The sum of the bond to be executed by an applicant for a special open consignment horse sale license shall be determined by estimating the dollar volume of business to be carried on, at, or through the applicant's proposed special open consignment horse sale. The bond amount shall be that amount estimated as the applicant's dollar volume of business. However, the bond shall not be in an amount less than ten thousand dollars. If the amount exceeds fifty thousand dollars, then that portion above fifty thousand dollars shall be at the rate of ten percent of that value, except that the amount of the bond shall be to the nearest greater five thousand dollar figure.

[ 1983 c 298 s 4.]